Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.25.150

Social purpose report required—Timing—Information—Failure to comply.

(1) The board of directors of a social purpose corporation shall cause a social purpose report to be furnished to the shareholders by making such report publicly accessible, free of charge, at the corporation's principal internet website address, not later than four months after the close of the corporation's fiscal year, and such report shall remain available on that website through the end of the corporation's fiscal year.

(2) The social purpose report shall include a narrative discussion concerning the social purpose or purposes of the corporation, including the corporation's efforts intended to promote its social purpose or purposes. The narrative discussion may include the following information:

(a) Identification and discussion of the short-term and long-term objectives of the corporation relating to its social purpose or purposes;

(b) Identification and discussion of the material actions taken by the corporation during the fiscal year to achieve its social purpose or purposes;

(c) Identification of material actions that the corporation expects to take in the future with respect to achievement of its social purpose or purposes; and

(d) A description of the financial, operating, or other measures used by the corporation during the fiscal year for evaluating its performance in achieving its social purpose or purposes.

(3) The requirements of subsection (1) of this section shall be satisfied if a social purpose corporation with an outstanding class of securities registered under section 12 of the securities exchange act of 1934 both complies with section 240.14a-16 of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations, as amended from time to time, with respect to the obligation of a corporation to furnish an annual report to shareholders pursuant to section 240.14a-3(b) of Title 17 of the Code of Federal Regulations, and includes the information required by subsection (2) of this section in the annual report.

(4) The failure to furnish to shareholders a social purpose report required by subsection (1) of this section does not affect the validity of any corporate action.

(5) The superior court of the county in which the social purpose corporation's registered office is located may, after notice to the corporation, summarily order a social purpose report to be furnished to shareholders on application of any shareholder of a social purpose corporation if a social purpose report was not furnished to shareholders for at least two consecutive fiscal years.

[ 2012 c 215 s 16.]